Utah statutes.
6-1-6.   Claims to be filed.
The claims of all creditors, clearly and distinctly stated and sworn to by the
claimant, or by some person acquainted with the facts, shall be filed with the
assignee within three months of the date of the first publication provided for
in the preceding section, unless the court extends such time for all or some
of such claimants, which it may do in its discretion where peculiar
circumstances seem to justify such extension, but in no case shall such
extension be extended beyond nine months.
